Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 1.181 is amended to read:
1.181. (1) Out of the amount specified in  section 1 (6), chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, the State
Treasurer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $19 million of net proceeds  for
the purposes specified in subsection [ (3)] (6) of this section,  plus an amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(2)[(a)] Bonds may not be issued  pursuant to this section or section 10, chapter 685, Oregon
Laws 2015,  unless[ :] a courthouse project meets the requirements of subsection (3) or (4) of
this section.
(3) Bonds may be issued pursuant to this section or section 10, chapter 685,  Oregon Laws
2015, if:
[(A)] (a) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court has determined that:
[(i)] (A) The courthouse with respect  to which the bonds will be issued has significant structural
defects, including seismic defects, that present actual or potential threats to human health  and
safety;
[(ii)] (B) Replacing the courthouse, whether by acquiring and  remodeling or repairing an exist-
ing building  or by constructing a new building, is more cost-effective than remodeling or repairing
the courthouse; and
[(iii)] (C) Replacing the courthouse creates an opportunity for colocation  of the court with other
state offices; and
[(B)] (b) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services has approved the project for which
the bonds will be issued.
(4) Bonds may be issued pursuant to this section or section 10, chapter 685,  Oregon Laws
2015, if:
(a) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court has determined that:
(A) Renovating or expanding  the court space in the courthouse, by remodeling or re-
pairing the existing courthouse space or by constructing an addition to the existing  court-
house building,  will directly benefit the court and is more feasible than replacing the
courthouse;
(B) Renovating or expanding the courthouse creates  or maintains an opportunity for
colocation of the circuit court with other state offices;
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-A) Page 1
(C) The renovated or expanded courthouse would  significantly improve the court facility,
according to criteria adopted by the Chief Justice; and
(D) If applicable, the project includes the remediation of significant building defects that
present actual or potential threats to human health and safety in the  existing courthouse
building; and
(b) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services has approved the project for
which the bonds will be issued.
[(b)] (5) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services, after consultation with the Judicial
Department, shall determine when net  proceeds are needed for the purposes described in subsection
[(3)] (6) of this section and shall consult with the Judicial Department regarding the sale of bonds
to be issued pursuant to this section.
[(3)] (6) The State Treasurer shall deposit the  net proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this
section and section 10, chapter 685, Oregon Laws  2015, in the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund. The net proceeds and any  interest earnings may be used solely to
finance costs related to acquiring, constructing, remodeling,  repairing, equipping or furnishing land,
improvements, courthouses or portions of courthouses that are, or that upon completion of a  project
funded under this section will be, owned or operated by the State of Oregon.
[(4)] (7) As used in ORS 286A.816 to 286A.826 with respect to this section:
(a) “Project agency” means the Judicial Department.
(b) “Project fund” means the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 1.183 is amended to read:
1.183. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 1.185, a county and the state, acting by and through  the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services on behalf of the Judicial Department, may enter into
interim agreements that provide for the funding,  acquisition, development , [ and] renovation, ex-
pansion or construction of a courthouse and require the  parties to negotiate in good faith and ex-
ecute a long-term lease agreement or a long-term  intergovernmental agreement with respect to the
ownership or operation of a courthouse or portions of a courthouse that the county is  required to
provide under ORS 1.185, pursuant  to which the state agrees to provide the property and services
described in ORS 1.185 (1)(a).
(b)(A) An agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection  for a  courthouse replacement
project under ORS 1.181 (3) or a  courthouse improvement project under ORS 1.181 (4)  may
include a requirement that the county transfer to the Oregon Courthouse Capital  Construction and
Improvement Fund an amount not less than 50 percent of the total estimated costs  of a project
funded with bonds issued pursuant  to ORS 1.181 or section 10, chapter 685, Oregon Laws 2015, with
respect to the courthouse or portions of a courthouse that are the subject of the agreement.
(B) The amount transferred by a county  pursuant to this paragraph may comprise, singly or in
any combination and proportion:
(i) Property tax revenues, bond proceeds or any other county moneys; and
(ii) A credit equal  to the higher of the appraised value or the actual purchase price of land
purchased by the county for the courthouse replacement project if the state approves of the land
as the site for the courthouse or for  the courthouse improvement project if the state approves
of the land as the site necessary to expand the existing courthouse .
(C) The  amount required to be transferred by the county under this subsection may not be less
than 75 percent of the total estimated costs unless the project includes the opportunity for
colocation in the courthouse of state offices in addition to the state circuit court facilities.
(2) For  purposes of ORS 1.181 and section 10, chapter 685, Oregon Laws 2015, the state shall
be considered to operate a courthouse or portions of a courthouse that are the subject of  an
agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if, as applicable:
(a) The  lease agreement conveys to the state a full leasehold interest, including exclusive rights
to control and use  the courthouse or portions of the courthouse that are typical of a long-term lease,
for a term that is at least equal to the term during which the bonds issued  pursuant to ORS 1.181
and section 10, chapter 685, Oregon Laws 2015, will remain outstanding.
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-A) Page 2
(b) The intergovernmental  agreement grants the state the exclusive right to control and use the
courthouse or portions of the courthouse for a term that is at least equal to  the term during which
the bonds issued pursuant to ORS 1.181 and  section 10, chapter 685, Oregon Laws 2015, will remain
outstanding.
SECTION 3.  ORS 1.184 is amended to read:
1.184. (1) The Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund is established in
the State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the
Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The  fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to ORS 1.181 and section 10,
chapter 685, Oregon Laws 2015, and moneys  transferred to the fund by a county pursuant to ORS
1.183 (1)(b) and may include fees, revenues  and other moneys appropriated by the Legislative As-
sembly for deposit in the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Judicial Department for:
(a) The purposes described in ORS 1.181 [ (3)] (6);
(b) Payment of the costs incurred by the department to administer the fund; and
(c) Payment of bond-related costs, as defined in ORS 286A.816.
SECTION 4.
 Section 45, chapter 559, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 45.  (1) For purposes of this  section, the purpose of community restoration is the restoration
of the defendant’s fitness to proceed in order to continue the criminal case.
(2)(a) If the  most serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation or a misdemeanor
other than a Class A misdemeanor, the maximum time period that the defendant may be ordered  to
engage in community restoration services is 90  days. The time period may be extended by the court
as described in subsection (3) of this section by an additional 90 days, up to a total of 180 days.
(b) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument is a Class A  misdemeanor other than
a person Class A  misdemeanor, the maximum time period that the defendant may be ordered to en-
gage in community restoration services is 90 days. The  time period may be extended by the court
as described in subsection (3) of this section by additional increments of  90 days, to up to a total
of 365 days.
(c) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument is a person Class  A misdemeanor or
a contempt charge, the maximum time  period that the defendant may be ordered to engage in com-
munity restoration services is six months. The time  period may be extended by the court as de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section by additional increments of six months, to up to a total of
18 months.
(d) If the most  serious offense in the charging instrument is a felony other than aggravated
murder, a violent felony or a crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2), the maximum time period that the
defendant may be ordered to engage in community restoration services is 12  months. The time pe-
riod may be extended by the  court as described in subsection (3) of this section by additional in-
crements of six months, to up to a total of 24 months.
(e) If the most  serious offense in the charging instrument is aggravated murder, a violent felony
or a crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2), the maximum time  period that the defendant may be ordered
to engage in community  restoration services is 18 months. The time period may be extended by the
court as described  in subsection (3) of this section by additional increments of six months, to up to
a total of 24 months.
(3)(a) The court may extend the  maximum time periods of community restoration services, up to
the total amounts specified  in subsection (2) this section, upon the request of a party as provided
in this subsection.
(b) A party may petition for an extension to the maximum period  of community restoration de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section. The petition must be submitted at least five days  prior to
the expiration of the maximum period of community restoration.  The court may extend the deadline
for filing a petition for good cause.
(c) Upon receipt of a petition described in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the court shall hold
a hearing. The hearing must occur within 30 days after the filing of the petition.
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-A) Page 3
(d) The court may extend the community restoration period if the court finds:
(A) There is clear evidence of progress toward  the defendant gaining or regaining fitness to
proceed; and
(B) That appropriate services are being made available to the defendant.
(e) The petitioning party has the burden of proof.
(f) The court may continue the order for the defendant  to participate in community restoration
services pending the outcome of the petition.
(4) The following time periods may not be considered when calculating the maximum period  of
community restoration services under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) A  period of time between a scheduled court appearance at which the defendant fails to ap-
pear and the next scheduled  court appearance at which the defendant appears, other than an ap-
pearance that occurs for the purpose of addressing the failure to appear;
(b) A  period of time between a scheduled fitness to proceed evaluation at which the defendant
fails to appear and the next scheduled court appearance at which the defendant appears;
(c) A period of time during which  the defendant is in violation of a release agreement condition
that the court finds negatively impacts the  defendant’s ability to participate or engage in community
restoration services, as determined by the court;
(d) A period of time during which the defendant is in  the custody of a local or state correctional
facility;
(e) A period of time during which the defendant  fails to make reasonable efforts toward gaining
or regaining fitness to proceed, as determined by the court;
(f) A period of time during which the defendant is not attending or complying with  community
restoration services treatment, and any nonattendance is not excused, as determined by the court;
(g) A period of time during which the defendant is  noncompliant with taking or receiving, or
verbally refuses to take or receive, prescribed medications, as determined by the court; and
(h) A period of time between the defendant’s absconsion from a secure residential treatment fa-
cility or other secure placement and the next scheduled court appearance at which  the defendant
appears.
(5) When a defendant has been ordered to engage in community restoration services:
(a) The court shall conduct regular status  reviews at least every 45 days. The status review may
consist of the court reviewing a report to the court by the community  mental health program di-
rector concerning the defendant’s progress. Any report provided to the court for a  status review
must include information concerning whether the defendant is making progress toward gaining  or
regaining fitness to proceed, what services that are being  provided to the defendant and the iden-
tification of any additional services that are required to meet the defendant’s restoration needs.
(b) The court shall conduct a review hearing at least every 180 days, or every 90 days if the
most serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation, a Class B or  Class C misdemeanor
or a Class A misdemeanor other than a person Class A misdemeanor.  At the review hearing, the
court shall determine whether the  purpose of community restoration is being met, and the court may
take any action authorized under ORS 161.370 (2)(c) at the hearing.
(c) The defendant shall be evaluated to determine whether the defendant has gained or  regained
fitness to proceed at least every 180 days.
(d) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument  is a violation, a Class B or Class C
misdemeanor or a Class  A misdemeanor other than a person Class A misdemeanor, the court shall
order that an updated evaluation, to determine whether  the defendant has gained or regained fitness
to proceed, be conducted and a report submitted to the court prior  to the review hearing occurring
90 days after the order to engage in community restoration services is entered.
(e) [ A community restoration services  provider shall immediately notify the court ] The community
mental health program director, or the entity providing community restoration services  to
the defendant, if the director delegates the duty to the entity, shall file notice  with the court
within two judicial days  following the  defendant’s noncompliance with taking or receiving, or
verbal refusal to take or receive, prescribed medications, or  any other  noncompliance  or unexcused
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-A) Page 4
absence from community restoration services treatment. The notice  shall contain a description of
the noncompliance and  efforts  taken to engage the defendant in taking or receiving medication
or attending and complying with treatment services. The  [ community restoration services provider ]
notifying party shall additionally notify the court  if the defendant thereafter begins taking or re-
ceiving prescribed medications or attending and complying with treatment services.
Passed by House March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-A) Page 5